California, session 20252026, SB909.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Public works construction projects are an essential component of California’s economy and ensure that citizens of the state have access to functional, high-quality, public infrastructure. According to the United States Census Bureau, as of August 2024, California’s public works construction market is valued at $46,000,000,000, up 37 percent over the last 10 years.(b) Despite the ongoing expansion of California’s construction sector and rising contractor revenues, wage theft still runs rampant in the construction industry. A recent University of California, Berkeley study found that wage theft by way of misclassifying workers and making payments under the table affects one in five construction workers.(c) The State of California currently boasts some of the strongest public works construction laws in the United States. However, a lack of prioritizing enforcement of our existing laws has led to an increased backlog of workers not receiving wages they are rightfully owed. Additionally, public works penalties that are intended to deter contractors from exploiting workers have remained unchanged since 2012. At the same time, the value of those penalties has decreased with the Consumer Price Index increasing 40 percent over the last 12 years.(d) In May 2024, the California State Auditor published an audit of the Department of Industrial Relations’ Division of Labor Standards Enforcement. Among the key findings, the California State Auditor found that the Labor Commissioner’s office was not providing timely adjudication of wage claims for workers primarily because of insufficient staffing to process those claims.(e) Between 2017 and 2023, the Labor Commissioner’s office had 47,000 backlogged wage claims and struggled to collect wage judgments from employers. For workers who chose to utilize the Labor Commissioner’s wage claim unit to attempt to collect owed wages, the adjudication unit was successful in collecting the entire amount owed to employees in only 12 percent of cases from 2018 to November 2023, inclusive.(f) According to the California State Auditor, lack of staffing, high vacancy rates, and low salaries offered to employees in the Labor Commissioner’s office are the primary reasons that the state has struggled to process wage claims and ensure workers experiencing wage theft are paid what they have already earned. The California State Auditor estimated that the Labor Commissioner’s office needs at least 892 full-time positions to resolve backlogged wage claims and provide appropriate supervisory coverage. As of May 2024, the Labor Commissioner’s adjudication unit had only 315 authorized positions. That number of positions is 577 short of the California State Auditor’s estimated need.(g) Currently, state efforts to enforce public works requirements are funded by the State Public Works Enforcement Fund. That fund is a special fund that receives revenues from an annual registration fee paid by all contractors that wish to bid on public works contracts. Despite the current stream of funding, additional resources are desperately needed to ensure the state’s public works enforcement capabilities are as robust as the labor protections that currently exist in statute.(h) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure strong state enforcement of public works laws by ensuring that contractor registration fees to fund enforcement are tied to inflation, and additionally ensure that existing penalties for public works violations are utilized in a manner that leads to further enforcement of the state’s public works labor laws.SEC. 2. Section 1725.5 of the Labor Code, as amended by Section 22 of Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:1725.5. A contractor shall be registered pursuant to this section to be qualified to bid on, be listed in a bid proposal, subject to the requirements of Section 4104 of the Public Contract Code, or engage in the performance of any public work contract that is subject to the requirements of this chapter. For the purposes of this section, “contractor” includes a subcontractor as defined by Section 1722.1.(a) To qualify for registration under this section, a contractor shall do all of the following:(1) (A) Register with the Department of Industrial Relations in the manner prescribed by the department and pay an initial nonrefundable application fee to qualify for registration under this section and an annual renewal fee on or before July 1 of each year thereafter. The director shall may establish and adjust annual registration and renewal fees fees, of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), by publishing the fees on the department’s internet website, and those actions shall not be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Any action taken to establish or adjust annual registration and renewal fees in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and the director shall thereafter publish those fees to the department’s internet website. The initial registration and renewal fees may be adjusted no more than annually by the director to support the costs specified in Section 1771.3.(B)For purposes of this section, the director shall annually adjust registration and renewal fees based on the increase or decrease in the Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index. The initial registration and renewal fees may be adjusted no more than annually by the director to support the costs specified in Section 1771.3.(C)(B) A contractor may register or renew according to this subdivision in annual increments up to three years from the date of registration. Contractors who wish to do so will be required to prepay the applicable nonrefundable application or renewal fees to qualify for the number of years for which they wish to preregister.(2) Provide evidence, disclosures, or releases as are necessary to establish all of the following:(A) Workers’ compensation coverage that meets the requirements of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and includes sufficient coverage for any worker whom the contractor employs to perform work that is subject to prevailing wage requirements other than a contractor who is separately registered under this section. Coverage may be evidenced by a current and valid certificate of workers’ compensation insurance or certification of self-insurance required under Section 7125 of the Business and Professions Code.(B) If applicable, the contractor is licensed in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of the Business and Professions Code.(C) The contractor does not have any delinquent liability to an employee or the state for any assessment of back wages or related damages, interest, fines, or penalties pursuant to any final judgment, order, or determination by a court or any federal, state, or local administrative agency, including a confirmed arbitration award. However, for purposes of this paragraph, the contractor shall not be disqualified for any judgment, order, or determination that is under appeal, provided that the contractor has secured the payment of any amount eventually found due through a bond or other appropriate means.(D) The contractor is not currently debarred under Section 1777.1 or under any other federal or state law providing for the debarment of contractors from public works.(E) The contractor has not bid on a public works contract, been listed in a bid proposal, or engaged in the performance of a contract for public works without being lawfully registered in accordance with this section, within the preceding 12 months or since the effective date of the requirements set forth in subdivision (e), whichever is earlier, and also has not been awarded a contract for, or engaged in the performance of, work on projects or developments without being lawfully registered in accordance with Section 1725.6, within the preceding 12 months. If a contractor is found to be in violation of the requirements of this paragraph, the period of disqualification shall be waived if both of the following are true:(i) The contractor has not previously been found to be in violation of the requirements of this paragraph within the preceding 12 months.(ii) The contractor pays an additional nonrefundable penalty registration fee of two thousand dollars ($2,000).(b) Fees received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established by Section 1771.3 and shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.(c) A contractor who fails to pay the renewal fee required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) on or before the expiration of any prior period of registration shall be prohibited from bidding on or engaging in the performance of any contract for public work until once again registered pursuant to this section. If the failure to pay the renewal fee was inadvertent, the contractor may renew its registration retroactively by paying an additional nonrefundable penalty renewal fee equal to the amount of the renewal fee within 90 days of the due date of the renewal fee.(d) If, after a body awarding a contract accepts the contractor’s bid or awards the contract, the work covered by the bid or contract is determined to be a public work to which Section 1771 applies, either as the result of a determination by the director pursuant to Section 1773.5 or a court decision, the requirements of this section shall not apply, subject to the following requirements:(1) The body that awarded the contract failed, in the bid specification or in the contract documents, to identify as a public work that portion of the work that the determination or decision subsequently classifies as a public work.(2) Within 20 days following service of notice on the awarding body of a determination by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 1773.5 or a decision by a court that the contract was for public work as defined in this chapter, the contractor and any subcontractors are registered under this section or are replaced by a contractor or subcontractors who are registered under this section.(3) The requirements of this section shall apply prospectively only to any subsequent bid, bid proposal, contract, or work performed after the awarding body is served with notice of the determination or decision referred to in paragraph (2).(e) The requirements of this section shall apply to any bid proposal submitted on or after March 1, 2015, to any contract for public work, as defined in this chapter, executed on or after April 1, 2015, and to any work performed under a contract for public work on or after January 1, 2018, regardless of when the contract for public work was executed.(f) This section does not apply to work performed on a public works project of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less when the project is for construction, alteration, demolition, installation, or repair work or to work performed on a public works project of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or less when the project is for maintenance work.(g) A contractor that has paid the registration or renewal fee and is registered under Section 1725.6 shall not pay the registration or renewal fee required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) to register as a contractor under this section.(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.SEC. 3. Section 1741 of the Labor Code is amended to read:1741. (a) If the Labor Commissioner or their designee determines after an investigation that there has been a violation of this chapter, the Labor Commissioner shall with reasonable promptness issue a civil wage and penalty assessment to the contractor or subcontractor, or both. The assessment shall be in writing, shall describe the nature of the violation and the amount of wages, penalties, and forfeitures due, and shall include the basis for the assessment. The assessment shall be served not later than 18 months after the filing of a valid notice of completion in the office of the county recorder in each county in which the public work or some part thereof was performed, or not later than 18 months after acceptance of the public work, whichever occurs last. Service of the assessment shall be completed pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure by first-class and certified mail to the contractor, subcontractor, and awarding body. The assessment shall advise the contractor and subcontractor of the procedure for obtaining review of the assessment. The Labor Commissioner shall, to the extent practicable, ascertain the identity of any bonding company issuing a bond that secures the payment of wages covered by the assessment and any surety on a bond, and shall serve a copy of the assessment by certified mail to the bonding company or surety at the same time service is made to the contractor, subcontractor, and awarding body. However, no bonding company or surety shall be relieved of its responsibilities because it failed to receive notice from the Labor Commissioner.(b) Interest shall accrue on all due and unpaid wages at the rate described in subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code. The interest shall accrue from the date that the wages were due and payable, as provided in Part 7 (commencing with Section 1720) of Division 2, until the wages are paid.(c) (1) The Labor Commissioner shall maintain a public list of the names of each contractor and subcontractor who has been found to have committed a willful violation of Section 1775 or to whom a final order, which is no longer subject to judicial review, has been issued.(2) The list shall include the date of each assessment, the amount of wages and penalties assessed, and the amount collected.(3) The list shall be updated at least quarterly, and the contractor’s or subcontractor’s name shall remain on that list until the assessment is satisfied, or for a period of three years beginning from the date of the issuance of the assessment, whichever is later.(d) Fifty percent of penalties received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established pursuant to Section 1771.3 and those moneys shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.SEC. 4. Section 1775 of the Labor Code is amended to read:1775. (a) (1) The contractor and any subcontractor under the contractor shall, as a penalty to the state or political subdivision on whose behalf the contract is made or awarded, forfeit not more than two hundred eighty dollars ($280) for each calendar day, or portion thereof, for each worker paid less than the prevailing wage rates as determined by the director for the work or craft in which the worker is employed for any public work done under the contract by the contractor or, except as provided in subdivision (b), by any subcontractor under the contractor.(2) (A) The amount of the penalty shall be determined by the Labor Commissioner based on consideration of both of the following:(i) Whether the failure of the contractor or subcontractor to pay the correct rate of per diem wages was a good faith mistake and, if so, the error was promptly and voluntarily corrected when brought to the attention of the contractor or subcontractor.(ii) Whether the contractor or subcontractor has a prior record of failing to meet its prevailing wage obligations.(B) (i) The penalty may not be less than fifty-six dollars ($56) for each calendar day, or portion thereof, for each worker paid less than the prevailing wage rate, unless the failure of the contractor or subcontractor to pay the correct rate of per diem wages was a good faith mistake and, if so, the error was promptly and voluntarily corrected when brought to the attention of the contractor or subcontractor.(ii) The penalty may not be less than one hundred twelve dollars ($112) for each calendar day, or portion thereof, for each worker paid less than the prevailing wage rate, if the contractor or subcontractor has been assessed penalties within the previous three years for failing to meet its prevailing wage obligations on a separate contract, unless those penalties were subsequently withdrawn or overturned.(iii) The penalty may not be less than one hundred sixty-eight dollars ($168) for each calendar day, or portion thereof, for each worker paid less than the prevailing wage rate, if the Labor Commissioner determines that the violation was willful, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1777.1.(C) If the amount due under this section is collected from the contractor or subcontractor, any outstanding wage claim under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 against that contractor or subcontractor shall be satisfied before applying that amount to the penalty imposed on that contractor or subcontractor pursuant to this section.(D) The determination of the Labor Commissioner as to the amount of the penalty shall be reviewable only for abuse of discretion.(E) The difference between the prevailing wage rates and the amount paid to each worker for each calendar day or portion thereof for which each worker was paid less than the prevailing wage rate shall be paid to each worker by the contractor or subcontractor, and the body awarding the contract shall cause to be inserted in the contract a stipulation that this section will be complied with.(3)The Labor Commissioner shall adjust the penalties pursuant to this subdivision annually, based on the increase or decrease in the Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index.(b) If a worker employed by a subcontractor on a public works project is not paid the general prevailing rate of per diem wages by the subcontractor, the prime contractor of the project is not liable for any penalties under subdivision (a) unless the prime contractor had knowledge of that failure of the subcontractor to pay the specified prevailing rate of wages to those workers or unless the prime contractor fails to comply with all of the following requirements:(1) The contract executed between the contractor and the subcontractor for the performance of work on the public works project shall include a copy of the provisions of this section and Sections 1771, 1776, 1777.5, 1813, and 1815.(2) The contractor shall monitor the payment of the specified general prevailing rate of per diem wages by the subcontractor to the employees, by periodic review of the certified payroll records of the subcontractor.(3) Upon becoming aware of the failure of the subcontractor to pay their workers the specified prevailing rate of wages, the contractor shall diligently take corrective action to halt or rectify the failure, including, but not limited to, retaining sufficient funds due the subcontractor for work performed on the public works project.(4) Prior to making final payment to the subcontractor for work performed on the public works project, the contractor shall obtain an affidavit signed under penalty of perjury from the subcontractor that the subcontractor has paid the specified general prevailing rate of per diem wages to their employees on the public works project and any amounts due pursuant to Section 1813.(c) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall notify the contractor on a public works project within 15 days of the receipt by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of a complaint of the failure of a subcontractor on that public works project to pay workers the general prevailing rate of per diem wages.(d) Fifty percent of penalties received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established pursuant to Section 1771.3, and those moneys shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.SEC. 5. Section 1776 of the Labor Code is amended to read:1776. (a) Each contractor and subcontractor shall keep accurate payroll records, showing the name, address, social security number, work classification, straight time and overtime hours worked each day and week, and the actual per diem wages paid to each journeyman, apprentice, worker, or other employee employed by the contractor or subcontractor in connection with the public work. Each payroll record shall contain or be verified by a written declaration that it is made under penalty of perjury, stating both of the following:(1) The information contained in the payroll record is true and correct.(2) The employer has complied with the requirements of Sections 1771, 1811, and 1815 for any work performed by that person’s employees on the public works project.(b) The payroll records enumerated under subdivision (a) shall be certified and shall be available for inspection at all reasonable hours at the principal office of the contractor on the following basis:(1) A certified copy of an employee’s payroll record shall be made available for inspection or furnished to the employee or the employee’s authorized representative on request.(2) A certified copy of all payroll records enumerated in subdivision (a) shall be made available for inspection or furnished upon request to a representative of the body awarding the contract and the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of the Department of Industrial Relations.(3) A certified copy of all payroll records enumerated in subdivision (a) shall be made available upon request by the public for inspection or for copies thereof. However, a request by the public shall be made through either the body awarding the contract or the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement. If the request is made through the awarding body and the body is not in possession of the certified payroll records, the awarding body shall obtain those records from the relevant contractor and make them available to the requesting entity. If the requested payroll records have not been provided pursuant to paragraph (2), the requesting party shall, prior to being provided the records, reimburse the costs of preparation by the contractor, subcontractors, and the entity through which the request was made. The public may not be given access to the records at the principal office of the contractor.(4) If an awarding body seeks to obtain payroll records pursuant to paragraph (3), the contractor shall have 10 days to comply following receipt of a written notice requesting the records described in subdivision (a). If the contractor or subcontractor fails to comply within the 10-day period, the awarding body shall notify the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement who may request penalties be withheld from progress payments then due as described in subdivision (h).(c) Unless required to be furnished directly to the Labor Commissioner in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1771.4, the certified payroll records shall be on forms provided by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement or shall contain the same information as the forms provided by the division. The payroll records may consist of printouts of payroll data that are maintained as computer records, if the printouts contain the same information as the forms provided by the division and the printouts are verified in the manner specified in subdivision (a).(d) A contractor or subcontractor shall file a certified copy of the records enumerated in subdivision (a) with the entity that requested the records within 10 days after receipt of a written request.(e) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (f), any copy of records made available for inspection as copies and furnished upon request to the public or any public agency by the awarding body or the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall be marked or obliterated to prevent disclosure of an individual’s name, address, and social security number. The name and address of the contractor awarded the contract or the subcontractor performing the contract shall not be marked or obliterated. Any copy of records made available for inspection by, or furnished to, a multiemployer Taft-Hartley trust fund (29 U.S.C. Sec. 186(c)(5)) that requests the records for the purposes of allocating contributions to participants shall be marked or obliterated only to prevent disclosure of an individual’s full social security number, but shall provide the last four digits of the social security number. Any copy of records made available for inspection by, or furnished to, a joint labor-management committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) shall be marked or obliterated only to prevent disclosure of an individual’s social security number.(2) Copies of electronic certified payroll records shall not satisfy payroll records requests made by Taft-Hartley trust funds and joint labor-management committees. Any copy of records requested by, and made available for inspection by or furnished to, a Taft-Hartley trust fund or joint labor-management committee shall be on forms provided by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement or shall contain the same information as the forms provided by the division.(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, agencies that are included in the Joint Enforcement Strike Force on the Underground Economy established pursuant to Section 329 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and other law enforcement agencies investigating violations of law shall, upon request, be provided nonredacted copies of certified payroll records. Any copies of records or certified payroll made available for inspection and furnished upon request to the public by an agency included in the Joint Enforcement Strike Force on the Underground Economy or to a law enforcement agency investigating a violation of law shall be marked or redacted to prevent disclosure of an individual’s name, address, and social security number.(2) An employer shall not be liable for damages in a civil action for any reasonable act or omission taken in good faith in compliance with this subdivision.(g) The contractor shall inform the body awarding the contract of the location of the records enumerated under subdivision (a), including the street address, city, and county, and shall, within five working days, provide a notice of a change of location and address.(h) The contractor or subcontractor has 10 days in which to comply subsequent to receipt of a written notice requesting the records enumerated in subdivision (a). In the event that the contractor or subcontractor fails to comply within the 10-day period, the contractor or subcontractor shall, as a penalty to the state or political subdivision on whose behalf the contract is made or awarded, forfeit one hundred forty dollars ($140) for each calendar day, or portion thereof, for each worker, until strict compliance is effectuated. Upon the request of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, these penalties shall be withheld from progress payments then due. A contractor is not subject to a penalty assessment pursuant to this section due to the failure of a subcontractor to comply with this section.(i) The body awarding the contract shall cause to be inserted in the contract stipulations to effectuate this section.(j) The director shall adopt rules consistent with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Title 1.8 (commencing with Section 1798) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) governing the release of these records, including the establishment of reasonable fees to be charged for reproducing copies of records required by this section.SEC. 6. Section 1777.7 of the Labor Code is amended to read:1777.7. (a) (1) If the Labor Commissioner or their designee determines after an investigation that a contractor or subcontractor knowingly violated Section 1777.5, the contractor and any subcontractor responsible for the violation shall forfeit, as a civil penalty to the state or political subdivision on whose behalf the contract is made or awarded, not more than one hundred forty dollars ($140) for each full calendar day of noncompliance. The amount of this penalty may be reduced by the Labor Commissioner if the amount of the penalty would be disproportionate to the severity of the violation. A contractor or subcontractor that knowingly commits a second or subsequent violation within a three-year period, if the noncompliance results in apprenticeship training not being provided as required by this chapter, shall forfeit as a civil penalty the sum of not more than four hundred twenty dollars ($420) for each full calendar day of noncompliance.(2) In lieu of the penalty provided for in this subdivision, the Labor Commissioner may, for a first-time violation and with the concurrence of an apprenticeship program described in subdivision (d) of Section 1777.5, order the contractor or subcontractor to provide apprentice employment equivalent to the work hours that would have been provided for apprentices during the period of noncompliance.(b) The Labor Commissioner shall consider, in setting the amount of a monetary penalty, all of the following circumstances:(1) Whether the violation was intentional.(2) Whether the party has committed other violations of Section 1777.5.(3) Whether, upon notice of the violation, the party took steps to voluntarily remedy the violation.(4) Whether, and to what extent, the violation resulted in lost training opportunities for apprentices.(5) Whether, and to what extent, the violation otherwise harmed apprentices or apprenticeship programs.(c) (1) The Labor Commissioner or their designee shall issue a civil wage and penalty assessment, in accordance with the provisions of Section 1741, upon determination of penalties assessed under subdivisions (a) and (b). Review of a civil wage and penalty assessment issued under this subdivision may be requested in accordance with the provisions of Section 1742. The regulations of the Director of Industrial Relations, which govern proceedings for review of civil wage and penalty assessments and the withholding of contract payments under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1720) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770), shall apply.(2) For purposes of this section, a determination issued pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) includes a determination that has been approved by the Labor Commissioner and issued by an awarding body that has been authorized to assist the director in the enforcement of Section 1777.5 pursuant to subdivision (p) of that section. The Labor Commissioner may intervene in any proceeding for review of a determination issued by an awarding body. If the involvement of the Labor Commissioner in a labor compliance program enforcement action is limited to a review of the determination and the matter is resolved without litigation by or against the Labor Commissioner or the department, the awarding body shall enforce any applicable penalties, as specified in this section, and shall deposit any penalties and forfeitures collected in the General Fund.(d) The determination of the Labor Commissioner as to the amount of the penalty imposed under subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be reviewable only for an abuse of discretion.(e) If a subcontractor is found to have violated Section 1777.5, the prime contractor of the project is not liable for any penalties under subdivision (a) unless the prime contractor had knowledge of the subcontractor’s failure to comply with the provisions of Section 1777.5 or unless the prime contractor fails to comply with any of the following requirements:(1) The contract executed between the contractor and the subcontractor for the performance of work on the public works project shall include a copy of the provisions of Sections 1771, 1775, 1776, 1777.5, 1813, and 1815.(2) The contractor shall continually monitor a subcontractor’s use of apprentices required to be employed on the public works project pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1777.5, including, but not limited to, periodic review of the certified payroll of the subcontractor.(3) Upon becoming aware of a failure of the subcontractor to employ the required number of apprentices, the contractor shall take corrective action, including, but not limited to, retaining funds due to the subcontractor for work performed on the public works project until the failure is corrected.(4) Prior to making the final payment to the subcontractor for work performed on the public works project, the contractor shall obtain a declaration signed under penalty of perjury from the subcontractor that the subcontractor has employed the required number of apprentices on the public works project.(f) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall notify the contractor on a public works project within 15 days of the receipt by the division of a complaint that a subcontractor on that public works project knowingly violated Section 1777.5.(g) The interpretation of Section 1777.5 and the substantive requirements of this section applicable to contractors or subcontractors shall be in accordance with the regulations of the California Apprenticeship Council.(h) The Director of Industrial Relations may adopt regulations to establish guidelines for the imposition of monetary penalties.(i) Fifty percent of penalties received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established pursuant to Section 1771.3, and those moneys shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.SEC. 7. Section 1813 of the Labor Code is amended to read:1813. (a) The contractor or subcontractor shall, as a penalty to the state or political subdivision on whose behalf the contract is made or awarded, forfeit thirty-five dollars ($35) for each worker employed in the execution of the contract by the respective contractor or subcontractor for each calendar day during which the worker is required or permitted to work more than 8 hours in any one calendar day and 40 hours in any one calendar week in violation of the provisions of this article. In awarding any contract for public work, the awarding body shall cause to be inserted in the contract a stipulation to this effect. The awarding body shall take cognizance of all violations of this article committed in the course of the execution of the contract, and shall report them to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.(b) Fifty percent of penalties received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established by Section 1771.3, and those moneys shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.